Maine, session 132, LD1432.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4552, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §1, is further amended to
read:
§4552. Policy
To protect the public health, safety and welfare, it is declared to be the policy of this
State to keep continually in review all practices infringing on the basic human right to a
life with dignity, and the causes of these practices, so that corrective measures may, where
possible, be promptly recommended and implemented, and to prevent discrimination in
employment, housing, education, extension of credit or access to public accommodations
on account of an individual's actual or perceived race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry or national origin and in
employment, extension of credit and access to public accommodations on the basis of age;
and in employment and housing on the basis of familial status; and in employment because
of the previous assertion of a claim or right against a prior employer under former Title 39
or Title 39‑A and because of protected activity under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B;
and to prevent discrimination or retaliation on the basis of an assertion of rights under this
Act or interference with an individual's right to be free from discrimination prohibited
under this Act.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§5-C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 464, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§10, ¶G, as amended by PL 2023, c. 489, §5, is further
amended to read:
G. Discrimination in employment, housing, public accommodation, credit and
educational opportunity on the basis of sexual orientation or gender identity, except
that a religious corporation, association or organization that does not receive public
funds is exempt from this provision with respect to:
(1) Employment, as is more fully set forth in section 4553, subsection 4 and section
4573‑A;
(2) Housing; and
(3) Educational opportunity.
Any for-profit organization owned, controlled or operated by a religious association or
corporation and subject to the provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, 26 United States Code, Section 511(a) is not covered by the exemptions set
forth in this paragraph; and
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §4571, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §4, is further amended to
read:
§4571. Right to freedom from discrimination in employment
The opportunity for an individual to secure employment without discrimination
because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental
disability, religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status is recognized as and
declared to be a civil right.
Page 1 - 132LR0880(01)

Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §4572, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 293, Pt. B, §2 and c.
366, §5 and c. 476, §1, is further amended to read:
1. Unlawful employment discrimination. It is unlawful employment discrimination,
in violation of this Act, except when based on a bona fide occupational qualification:
A. For any employer to fail or refuse to hire or otherwise discriminate against any
applicant for employment because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender
identity, physical or mental disability, religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial
status, because of the applicant's previous assertion of a claim or right under former
Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous actions taken by the applicant that are
protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because the applicant sought and
received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007; or, because of those
reasons, to discharge an employee or discriminate with respect to hire, tenure,
promotion, transfer, compensation, terms, conditions or privileges of employment or
any other matter directly or indirectly related to employment; or, in recruiting of
individuals for employment or in hiring them, to utilize any employment agency that
the employer knows or has reasonable cause to know discriminates against individuals
because of their race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of
their previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because
of previous actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or
because the applicant sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
section 4007.
(1) This paragraph does not apply to discrimination governed by Title 39‑A,
section 353;
B. For any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly, refer for
employment or otherwise discriminate against any individual because of race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, age,
ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of the individual's previous
assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous
actions taken by the individual that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter
5‑B or because the individual sought and received an order of protection under Title
19‑A, section 4007; or to comply with an employer's request for the referral of job
applicants if a request indicates either directly or indirectly that the employer will not
afford full and equal employment opportunities to individuals regardless of their race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of previous assertion
of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous actions that
are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or because the individual sought
and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
C. For any labor organization to exclude from apprenticeship or membership or to
deny full and equal membership rights to any applicant for membership because of race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of the applicant's
previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of
previous actions taken by the applicant that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7,
Page 2 - 132LR0880(01)

416 subchapter 5‑B or because the applicant sought and received an order of protection
427 under Title 19‑A, section 4007; or, because of those reasons, to deny a member full
438 and equal membership rights, expel from membership, penalize or otherwise
449 discriminate with respect to hire, tenure, promotion, transfer, compensation, terms,
550 conditions or privileges of employment, representation, grievances or any other matter
561 directly or indirectly related to membership or employment, whether or not authorized
572 or required by the constitution or bylaws of that labor organization or by a collective
583 labor agreement or other contract; to fail or refuse to classify properly or refer for
594 employment or otherwise discriminate against any member because of race or color,
1505 sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, age,
1516 ancestry, national origin or familial status, because of the member's previous assertion
1527 of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, because of previous actions
1538 taken by the member that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or
1549 because the applicant sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
1650 section 4007; or to cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an
1661 individual in violation of this section, except that it is lawful for labor organizations
1672 and employers to adopt a maximum age limitation in apprenticeship programs, if the
1683 employer or labor organization obtains prior approval from the Maine Human Rights
1694 Commission of any maximum age limitation employed in an apprenticeship program.
2605 The commission shall approve the age limitation if a reasonable relationship exists
2616 between the maximum age limitation employed and a legitimate expectation of the
2627 employer in receiving a reasonable return upon the employer's investment in an
2638 apprenticeship program. The employer or labor organization bears the burden of
2649 demonstrating that such a relationship exists;
D. For any employer, employment agency or labor organization, prior to employment
or admission to membership of any individual, to:
(1) Elicit or attempt to elicit information directly or indirectly pertaining to race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, any previous assertion of
a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any previous actions that are
protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any previous actions seeking
and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
(2) Make or keep a record of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender
identity, physical or mental disability, religion, age, ancestry, national origin or
familial status, any previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or
Title 39‑A, any previous actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7,
subchapter 5‑B or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, section 4007, except that, in relation to physical or mental
disability, when an employer requires a physical or mental examination prior to
employment, a privileged record of that examination is permissible if made and
kept in compliance with this Act;
(3) Use any form of application for employment, or personnel or membership
blank containing questions or entries directly or indirectly pertaining to race or
color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, any previous assertion of
a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any previous actions that are
Page 3 - 132LR0880(01)

417 protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any previous actions seeking
428 and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007. This section
439 does not prohibit any officially recognized government agency from keeping
540 records permitted to be kept under this Act in order to provide free services to
551 individuals requesting rehabilitation or employment assistance;
(4) Print, publish or cause to be printed or published any notice or advertisement
relating to employment or membership indicating any preference, limitation,
specification or discrimination based upon race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, age, ancestry, national
origin or familial status, any previous assertion of a claim or right under former
Title 39 or Title 39‑A, any previous actions that are protected under Title 26,
chapter 7, subchapter 5‑B or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order
of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007; or
(5) Establish, announce or follow a policy of denying or limiting, through a quota
system or otherwise, employment or membership opportunities of any group
because of the race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, age, ancestry, national origin or familial status, because
of the previous assertion of a claim or right under former Title 39 or Title 39‑A,
because of previous actions that are protected under Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter
5‑B or because of any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of protection
under Title 19‑A, section 4007, of that group; or
E. For an employer, employment agency or labor organization to discriminate in any
manner against individuals because they have opposed a practice that would be a
violation of this Act or because they have made a charge, testified or assisted in any
investigation, proceeding or hearing under this Act. This paragraph does not limit the
liability of persons pursuant to section 4633.
Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §4581, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §7 and c. 476, §2,
is further amended to read:
The opportunity for an individual to secure housing in accordance with the individual's
ability to pay, and without discrimination because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or familial
status or because the individual has sought and received an order of protection under Title
19‑A, section 4007, is hereby recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 7. 5 MRSA §4581-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §§8 to 10 and c. 476,
§3, is further amended to read:
§4581-A. Unlawful housing discrimination
It is unlawful housing discrimination, in violation of this Act:
1. Sale or rental of housing and other prohibited practices. For any owner, lessee,
sublessee, managing agent or other person having the right to sell or rent or manage a
housing accommodation, or any agent of these, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and receiving
Page 4 - 132LR0880(01)

414 an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007 of any prospective purchaser,
425 occupant or tenant of the housing accommodation;
B. Refuse to show or refuse to sell, rent, lease, let or otherwise deny to or withhold
from any person the housing accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national
origin or familial status or because the person sought and received an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
C. Make, print or publish or cause to be made, printed or published any notice,
statement or advertisement relating to the sale, rental or lease of the housing
accommodation that indicates any preference, limitation or discrimination based upon
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and
receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007 or an intention to make
any such preference, limitation or discrimination;
D. Discriminate against any person because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or
familial status or because the person sought and received an order of protection under
Title 19‑A, section 4007 in the price, terms, conditions or privileges of the sale, rental
or lease of any housing accommodations or in the furnishing of facilities or services in
connection with any housing accommodations; or
E. Evict or attempt to evict any tenant of any housing accommodation because of the
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin or familial status of the tenant or because the tenant
sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
2. Selling, brokering or appraising of housing. For any real estate broker or real
estate salesperson, or any agent of these, to:
A. Fail or refuse to show any person a housing accommodation listed for sale, lease or
rent because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or
mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or familial status or because the
person sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007;
B. Misrepresent, for the purpose of discriminating because of race or color, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national
origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and receiving an order of
protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007, the availability or asking price of a housing
accommodation listed for sale, lease or rent or for such reason to fail to communicate
to the person having the right to sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation any
offer for the same made by any applicant;
C. In any other manner to discriminate against any applicant for a housing
accommodation because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity,
physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin or familial status or
because the applicant sought and received an order of protection under Title 19‑A,
section 4007;
D. Make or cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record concerning the race
or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
Page 5 - 132LR0880(01)

415 religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and
426 receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007 of any applicant for or
437 intended occupant of a housing accommodation; or
E. Accept for listing any housing accommodation when the person having the right to
sell, rent or lease the housing accommodation has directly or indirectly indicated an
intention of discriminating among prospective tenants or purchasers on the ground of
race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and
receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007, or when the broker or
salesperson knows or has reason to know that the person having the right to sell, rent
or lease the housing accommodation has made a practice of discrimination since July
1, 1972;
3. Making of loans; other financial assistance. For any person to whom application
is made for a loan or other form of financial assistance for the acquisition, construction,
rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation, whether secured or
unsecured, or agent of the person, to:
A. Make or cause to be made any oral or written inquiry concerning the race or color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous actions seeking and receiving
an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007 of any applicant for financial
assistance or of existing or prospective occupants or tenants of housing
accommodations; or
B. Discriminate in the granting of financial assistance, or in the terms, conditions or
privileges relating to obtaining or the use of any financial assistance, against any
applicant because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous
actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007; or
4. Receipt of public assistance. For any person furnishing rental premises or public
accommodations to refuse to rent or impose different terms of tenancy to any individual
who is a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance, including medical assistance
and housing subsidies, primarily because of the individual's status as recipient.
Sec. 8. 5 MRSA §4583, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §11, is further amended to
read:
§4583. Application
Nothing in this Act may be construed to prohibit or limit the exercise of the privilege
of every person and the agent of any person having the right to sell, rent, lease or manage
a housing accommodation to set up and enforce specifications in the selling, renting,
leasing or letting or in the furnishings of facilities or services in connection with the
facilities that are consistent with business necessity and are not based on the race, color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion, country of
ancestral origin or familial status of or the receipt of public assistance payments by any
prospective or actual purchaser, lessee, tenant or occupant. Nothing in this Act may be
construed to prohibit or limit the exercise of the privilege of every person and the agent of
any person making loans for or offering financial assistance in the acquisition, construction,
Page 6 - 132LR0880(01)

415 rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of housing accommodations to set standards and
426 preferences, terms, conditions, limitations or specifications for the granting of loans or
437 financial assistance that are consistent with business necessity and are not based on the
448 race, color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability, religion,
459 country of ancestral origin or familial status of or the receipt of public assistance payments
560 by the applicant for a loan or financial assistance or of any existing or prospective owner,
571 lessee, tenant or occupant of a housing accommodation.
Sec. 9. 5 MRSA §4591, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §12, is further amended to
read:
§4591. Equal access to public accommodations
The opportunity for every individual to have equal access to places of public
accommodation without discrimination because of race, color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry or national origin is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 10. 5 MRSA §4592, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 489, §§7 to 9, is
further amended to read:
1. Denial of public accommodations. For any public accommodation or any person
who is the owner, lessor, lessee, proprietor, operator, manager, superintendent, agent or
employee of any place of public accommodation to directly or indirectly refuse,
discriminate against or in any manner withhold from or deny the full and equal enjoyment
to any person, on account of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, age,
physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry or national origin, any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, services or privileges of public
accommodation, or in any manner discriminate against any person in the price, terms or
conditions upon which access to accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, services
and privileges may depend.
For purposes of this subsection, unlawful discrimination also includes, but is not limited
to:
A. The imposition or application of eligibility criteria that screen out or tend to screen
out an individual with a disability or any class of individuals with disabilities from fully
and equally enjoying any goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages or
accommodations, unless the criteria can be shown to be necessary for the provision of
the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages or accommodations being offered;
B. A failure to make reasonable modifications in policies, practices or procedures,
when modifications are necessary to afford the goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages or accommodations to individuals with disabilities, unless, in the case of a
private entity, the private entity can demonstrate that making the modifications would
fundamentally alter the nature of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages
or accommodations;
C. A failure to take steps that may be necessary to ensure that no individual with a
disability is excluded, denied services, segregated or otherwise treated differently than
other individuals because of the absence of auxiliary aids and services, unless, in the
case of a private entity, the private entity can demonstrate that taking those steps would
Page 7 - 132LR0880(01)

414 fundamentally alter the nature of the good, service, facility, privilege, advantage or
425 accommodation being offered or would result in an undue burden; and
D. A private entity's failure to remove architectural barriers and communication
barriers that are structural in nature in existing facilities and transportation barriers in
existing vehicles and rail passenger cars used by an establishment for transporting
individuals, not including barriers that can be removed only through the retrofitting of
vehicles or rail passenger cars by the installation of a hydraulic or other lift, where the
removal is readily achievable.
When the entity can demonstrate that the removal of a barrier under this paragraph is
not readily achievable, a failure to make the goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages or accommodations available through alternative methods if alternative
methods are readily achievable;
Sec. 11. 5 MRSA §4592, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §14, is further
amended to read:
2. Communication, notice or advertisement. For any person to directly or indirectly
publish, display or communicate any notice or advertisement to the effect that any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of any place of public
accommodation are refused, withheld from or denied to any person on account of race or
color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion,
ancestry or national origin, or that the patronage or custom of any person belonging to or
purporting to be of any particular race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity,
age, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry or national origin is unwelcome,
objectionable or not acceptable, desired or solicited, or that the clientele is restricted to any
particular race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, age, physical or mental
disability, religion, ancestry or national origin. The production of any communication,
notice or advertisement purporting to relate to any place of accommodation is presumptive
evidence in any action that the action was authorized by its owner, manager or proprietor;
Sec. 12. 5 MRSA §4595, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §16, is further amended
to read:
§4595. Right to freedom from discrimination solely on basis of age, race, color, sex,
sexual orientation or gender identity, marital status, ancestry, religion or
national origin in any credit transaction
The opportunity for every individual to be extended credit without discrimination
solely because of any one or more of the following factors: age; race; color; sex; sexual
orientation or gender identity; marital status; ancestry; religion or national origin is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 13. 5 MRSA §4596, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. B, §65, is amended to
read:
§4596. Unlawful credit extension discrimination
It is unlawful credit discrimination for any creditor to refuse the extension of credit to
any person solely on the basis of any one or more of the following factors: age, race, color,
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, marital status, ancestry, religion or national
origin in any credit transaction. It is not unlawful credit discrimination to comply with the
Page 8 - 132LR0880(01)

414 terms and conditions of any bona fide group credit life, accident and health insurance plan,
425 for a financial institution extending credit to a married person to require both spouses to
436 sign a note and a mortgage and to deny credit to persons under 18 years of age or to consider
447 a person's age in determining the terms upon which credit will be extended.
Sec. 14. 5 MRSA §4601, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §18, is further amended
to read:
§4601. Right to freedom from discrimination in education
The opportunity for an individual at an educational institution to participate in all
educational, counseling and vocational guidance programs, all apprenticeship and on-the-
job training programs and all extracurricular activities without discrimination because of
sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, a physical or mental disability, ancestry, national
origin, race, color or religion is recognized and declared to be a civil right.
Sec. 15. 5 MRSA §4602, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §19, is further
amended to read:
1. Unlawful educational discrimination. It is unlawful educational discrimination
in violation of this Act, on the basis of sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, ancestry, national origin, race, color or religion, to:
A. Exclude a person from participation in, deny a person the benefits of, or subject a
person to, discrimination in any academic, extracurricular, research, occupational
training or other program or activity;
B. Deny a person equal opportunity in athletic programs;
C. Apply any rule concerning the actual or potential familial status or marital status of
a person or to exclude any person from any program or activity because of pregnancy
or related conditions or because of sex or sexual orientation or gender identity;
D. Deny a person admission to the institution or program or to fail to provide equal
access to and information about an institution or program through recruitment; or
E. Deny a person financial assistance availability and opportunity.
Sec. 16. 5 MRSA §4602, sub-§5, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 366, §19, is
amended to read:
C. Requires a religious corporation, association or society that does not receive public
funding to comply with this section as it relates to sexual orientation or gender identity;
or
Sec. 17. 5 MRSA §4630, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 489, §10, is amended
to read:
1. Unlawful discrimination. A public entity may not discriminate against an
individual, exclude an individual from participation in a service, program or activity of that
public entity or otherwise deny to an individual the benefits of a service, program or activity
of that public entity by reason of the individual's race or color, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, religion, ancestry or national origin.
Sec. 18. 37-B MRSA §517, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 202, §3, is
repealed.
Page 9 - 132LR0880(01)